Utah statutes.
31A-22-805.   Beginning date of insurance.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), any credit life insurance or
credit accident and health insurance, subject to acceptance by the insurer,
commences on the date when the debtor becomes obligated to the creditor.
(2) (a)  Where a group policy provides coverage for existing obligations, the
insurance on a debtor with respect to that indebtedness commences on the
effective date of the policy.
(b)  Where evidence of insurability is required and the evidence is furnished
more than 30 days after the debtor becomes obligated to the creditor, the
insurance may commence when the insurance company determines the evidence of
insurability to be satisfactory.  In this event, the insurer shall make an
appropriate refund or adjustment of any charge to the debtor for insurance.
(3)  The insurance may not extend more than 15 days beyond the scheduled
maturity date of the indebtedness, unless it does so at no additional cost to
the debtor.
(4)  If the indebtedness is discharged due to renewal or refinancing prior to
the scheduled maturity date, the insurance in force shall terminate before any
new insurance may be issued in connection with the renewed or refinanced
indebtedness.  In all cases of termination prior to scheduled maturity, a
refund shall be paid or credited as provided in Section 31A-22-808.
